Utah statutes.
48-3a-1101.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Professional services" means a personal service provided by:

(a)  a public accountant holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 26a, Certified Public Accountant Licensing Act, or a subsequent law regulating the practice of public accounting;

(b)  an architect holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 3a, Architects Licensing Act, or a subsequent law regulating the practice of architecture;

(c)  an attorney granted the authority to practice law by the:

(i)  Utah Supreme Court; or

(ii)  one or more of the following that licenses or regulates the authority to practice law in a state or territory of the United States other than Utah:

(A)  a supreme court;

(B)  a court other than a supreme court;

(C)  an agency;

(D)  an instrumentality; or

(E)  a regulating board;

(d)  a chiropractor holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 73, Chiropractic Physician Practice Act, or any subsequent law regulating the practice of chiropractics;

(e)  a doctor of dentistry holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 69, Dentist and Dental Hygienist Practice Act, or a subsequent law regulating the practice of dentistry;

(f)  a professional engineer registered under Title 58, Chapter 22, Professional Engineers and Professional Land Surveyors Licensing Act, or a subsequent law regulating the practice of engineers and land surveyors;

(g)  a naturopath holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 71, Naturopathic Physician Practice Act, or a subsequent law regulating the practice of naturopathy;

(h)  a nurse licensed under Title 58, Chapter 31b, Nurse Practice Act, or Title 58, Chapter 44a, Nurse Midwife Practice Act, or a subsequent law regulating the practice of nursing;

(i)  an optometrist holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 16a, Utah Optometry Practice Act, or a subsequent law regulating the practice of optometry;

(j)  an osteopathic physician or surgeon holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act, or a subsequent law regulating the practice of osteopathy;

(k)  a pharmacist holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 17b, Pharmacy Practice Act, or a subsequent law regulating the practice of pharmacy;

(l)  a physician, surgeon, or doctor of medicine holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act, or a subsequent law regulating the practice of medicine;

(m)  a physical therapist holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 24b, Physical Therapy Practice Act, or a subsequent law regulating the practice of physical therapy;

(n)  a podiatric physician holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 5a, Podiatric Physician Licensing Act, or a subsequent law regulating the practice of podiatry;

(o)  a psychologist holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 61, Psychologist Licensing Act, or any subsequent law regulating the practice of psychology;

(p)  a principal broker, associate broker, or sales agent holding a license under Title 61, Chapter 2f, Real Estate Licensing and Practices Act, or a subsequent law regulating the sale, exchange, purchase, rental, or leasing of real estate;

(q)  a clinical or certified social worker holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 60, Part 2, Social Worker Licensing Act, or a subsequent law regulating the practice of social work;

(r)  a mental health therapist holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 60, Mental Health Professional Practice Act, or a subsequent law regulating the practice of mental health therapy;

(s)  a veterinarian holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 28, Veterinary Practice Act, or a subsequent law regulating the practice of veterinary medicine; or

(t)  an individual licensed, certified, or registered under Title 61, Chapter 2g, Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Act, or a subsequent law regulating the practice of appraising real estate.

(2)  "Regulating board" means the entity organized pursuant to state law that licenses and regulates the practice of the profession that a limited liability company is organized to provide.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

